Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.3902

Act to control inconsistencies.

To the extent that the provisions of *this 1969 amendatory act are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of *this 1969 amendatory act shall be controlling.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 43. Formerly RCW 41.26.910.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this 1969 amendatory act," see note following chapter digest.